Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The Oregon  Hatchery Research Center Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Hatchery Research
Center Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys received from the surcharge on angling licenses imposed by section 3 [ of this 2015
Act], chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015 ; and
(b) All moneys received from the ad valorem fee  imposed by section 4 [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter
734, Oregon Laws 2015 .
(2) [Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, ] Moneys in the fund may be expended only
on research projects recommended by the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Board.
[(3) Any  unexpended and unobligated balance in the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Fund as
calculated on July 1 of each year shall be transferred to the Hatchery Construction Fund. ]
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The Hatchery Construction Fund is established in the  State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Hatchery  Construction Fund shall be cred-
ited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the State Department of Fish
and Wildlife. The fund shall consist of [ moneys transferred to the fund under section 1 of  this 2015
Act and ] any moneys [ transferred] appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly  and
moneys received by the department for the purposes established in this  section in the form
of gifts, grants, bequests, endowments or donations . Moneys in the fund may  be expended only
to improve,  upgrade or replace current coastal hatchery facilities in order to incorporate new
technologies [ or to make physical improvements to the hatchery facilities ].
SECTION 3.  Section 8, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 53, chapter 779,
Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1)(a) Sections [ 1, 2,] 4 and 7, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, are repealed on January
2, 2027.
(b) Section 3, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 52  [ of this 2015 Act ],
chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015 , is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Enrolled House Bill 2266 (HB 2266-B) Page 1
(c) Section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015,  as amended by section 1 of this 2017 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2027.
(2) Any balance in the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Fund  that is unexpended and unobli-
gated on the date of the  repeal of section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, and all moneys that
would have been deposited in  the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Fund had section 1, chapter
734, Oregon Laws 2015, remained in  effect, shall be transferred to and deposited in [ the Fish
Endowment Subaccount in the Fish and Wildlife  Account, and are appropriated for expenditure as in
the case of other moneys in  the Fish Endowment Subaccount ] the Hatchery Construction Fund, and
are appropriated for expenditure as in the case of other moneys in  the Hatchery Con-
struction Fund.
[(3) Any balance in the  Hatchery Construction Fund that is unexpended and unobligated on the
date of the repeal of  section 2, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, and all moneys that would have been
deposited in the Hatchery Construction Fund had section 2, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015,  remained
in effect, shall be transferred to and deposited in the Fish Endowment Subaccount in the Fish and
Wildlife Account, and are appropriated for expenditure  as in the case of other moneys in the Fish
Endowment Subaccount.]
SECTION 4.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 14, 2017
Repassed by House May 11, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 9, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2266 (HB 2266-B) Page 2